West Virginia, session 2026, HB4740.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 3. PURCHASING DIVISION. §5A-3-3d. Exemption of Rural Health Transformation Program. (a) The Legislature hereby finds and declares:(1) That the federal Rural Health Transformation Program presents an unprecedented opportunity for the State to make critical improvements to health care in rural areas, modernize various aspects of health care delivery systems, enhance educational and work force pathways for health care, and expand the technological boundaries of health care science, analytics, and technology for the benefit of all West Virginians;  (2) That the federal Rural Health Transformation Program places many significant compliance requirements on the use of federal funds granted to the Department of Health, that use of funds received from the federal Rural Health Transformation Program must be used in accordance with the requirements and limitations of that program reflected in guidance and documentation from U.S. Center for Medicare and Medicaid Services ("CMS"); (3) That CMS will be closely monitoring the progress of the State’s implementation of the program outlined in its application for funding submitted to CMS on November 5, 2025, and granted an award on or about December 29, 2025;  (4) That the federal Rural Health Transformation Program requires rapid, targeted deployment of the awarded funds; and(5) That such utilization be performed within rigid time frames, with the understanding that failures to comply with the limitations on how these funds may be used—as well as requirements on proper processes for the deployment—may result in clawbacks of funds both currently awarded as well as jeopardizing future awards by CMS.  (b) To ensure conformity with the unique requirements of the federal Rural Health Transformation Program, notwithstanding any provisions of §5A-3-1 or § 5A-3-3 of this code to the contrary, the provisions of this article shall not apply to the State’s implementation of the Rural Health Transformation Program, for which the program office is located within the Department of Health.The Clerk of the House of Delegates and the Clerk of the Senate hereby certify that the foregoing bill is correctly enrolled.  ............................................................... Clerk of the House of Delegates  		............................................................... Clerk of the Senate				                  Originated in the House of Delegates. In effect from passage.    				............................................................... Speaker of the House of Delegates  						............................................................... President of the Senate  __________   	The within is ................................................ this the........................................... Day of ..........................................................................................................., 2026.  				.............................................................								Governor Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home